North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-03 County Human Services Fund [Repealed]

50-03-00.1.
Definitions.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 5; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-01.
Board of county commissioners may levy human services funding.
[Repealed]

Source:

Pol. C. 1877, ch. 33, § 33; R.C. 1895, § 1505; R.C. 1899, § 1505; R.C. 1905, § 1881; C.L. 1913, § 2539; R.C. 1943, § 50-0301; S.L. 1991, ch. 504, § 3; 2015, ch. 439, § 64, effective January 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-02.
County human services fund.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 98, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, § 50-0302; 1991, ch. 504, § 4; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-03.
Relief expenditures paid from human services fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 98, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 50-0303; 1991, ch. 504, § 5; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-04.
Transfer of money to human services fund.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 98, § 4; 1935, ch. 120, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0304; S.L. 1991, ch. 504, § 6; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-05.
Emergency expenditures — Special warrants.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 98, § 4; 1935, ch. 120, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0305; S.L. 1991, ch. 504, § 7; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-06.
County human services program levy insufficiency due to extraordinary impact — Application for state assistance.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1933, ch. 98, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 50-0306; S.L. 1991, ch. 504, § 8; 2015, ch. 439, § 65, effective January 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-07.
Appropriation for food stamp program administration — Financial agreement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13.

50-03-08.
Appropriation for county social service board administration of locally administered economic assistance programs.
[Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 6; 2015, ch. 329, § 3, effective January 1, 2016; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-09.
Department to develop formula. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 329, § 11, eff January 1, 2016; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.

50-03-10.
County commissions to make recommendations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 8; 2005, ch. 416, § 2; 2007, ch. 417, § 5; 2017, ch. 341, § 15, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 391, § 138, effective July 1, 2019.